North Carolina statutes. Chapter 126. North Carolina Human Resources Act.
Article 13. Veteran’s Preference.

§ 126-80.
Declaration of policy.

It shall be the policy of the State of North Carolina that, in appreciation for their service to this State and this country during a period of war, and in recognition of the time and advantage lost toward the pursuit of a civilian career, veterans shall be granted preference in employment for positions subject to the provisions of this Chapter with every State department, agency, and institution.

History.

1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1064, s. 1.

§ 126-80.5.
National Guard preference.

It shall be the policy of the State of North Carolina that, in recognition and appreciation for service to the State and this country, and in recognition of the time and advantage lost toward the pursuit of a civilian career, an eligible member of the National Guard as defined in G.S. 126-81(4) shall be granted preference in employment for positions subject to the provisions of this Chapter with every State department, agency, and institution.

In all evaluations of applicants for positions with this State or any of its departments, agencies, or institutions, a preference shall be awarded to all eligible members of the National Guard who are citizens of the State. This preference applies to initial employment and extends to other employment events, including a subsequent hiring, promotion, reassignment, or horizontal transfer.

The provisions of this section shall be subject to the provisions of Article 9 of Chapter 143B of the General Statutes.

History.

2021-180, s. 19E.4(a).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s 19E.4(d), made this section, as added by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19E.4(a), effective November 18, 2021.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

§ 126-81.
Definitions.

The following definitions apply in this Article:

Period of war. — World War I (April 16, 1917, through November 11, 1918), World War II (December 7, 1941, through December 31, 1946), the Korean Conflict (June 27, 1950, through January 31, 1955), the period of time between January 31, 1955, and the end of the hostilities in Vietnam (May 7, 1975), or any other campaign, expedition, or engagement for which a campaign badge or medal is authorized by the United States Department of Defense.

Veteran. — A person who served in the Armed Forces of the United States on active duty, for reasons other than training, and has been discharged under other than dishonorable conditions.

Eligible veteran. — Any of the following:

A veteran who served during a period of war.

The spouse of a disabled veteran.

The surviving spouse or dependent of a veteran who dies on active duty during a period of war either directly or indirectly as a result of such service.

A veteran who suffered a service-connected disability during peacetime.

The spouse of a veteran described in sub-subdivision d. of this subdivision.

The surviving spouse or dependent of a person who served in the Armed Forces of the United States on active duty, for reasons other than training, who died for service-related reasons during peacetime.

Eligible member of the National Guard. — Any of the following:

A resident of North Carolina who is a current member in good standing of either the North Carolina Army National Guard or the North Carolina Air National Guard.

A resident of North Carolina who is a former member of either the North Carolina Army National Guard or the North Carolina Air National Guard, whose discharge is under honorable conditions with a minimum of six years of creditable service.

The surviving spouse and dependent of a member of the North Carolina Army National Guard or the North Carolina Air National Guard who dies on State active duty either directly or indirectly as a result of that service.

The surviving spouse or dependent of a member of the North Carolina National Guard who died for service-related reasons during peacetime.

History.

1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1064, s. 1; 2021-180, s. 19E.4(b).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19E.4(b), effective November 18, 2021, substituted “The following definitions apply in this Article” for “As used in this Article” in the introductory language; added “Any of the following” in subdivision (3); added subdivision (4); and made stylistic and punctuation changes.

§ 126-82.
State Human Resources Commission to provide for preference.

The State Human Resources Commission shall provide that in evaluating the qualifications of an eligible veteran against the minimum requirements for obtaining a position, credit shall be given for all military service training or schooling and experience that bears a reasonable and functional relationship to the knowledge, skills, and abilities required for the position. This preference applies to initial employment with the State and extends to other employment events including subsequent hirings, promotions, reassignments, and horizontal transfers.

The State Human Resources Commission shall provide that if an eligible veteran has met the minimum requirements for the position, after receiving experience credit under subsection (a) of this section, he shall receive experience credit as determined by the Commission for additional related and unrelated military service. This preference applies to initial employment with the State and extends to other employment events including subsequent hirings, promotions, reassignments, and horizontal transfers.

The State Human Resources Commission may provide that in reduction in force situations where seniority or years of service is one of the considerations for retention, an eligible veteran shall be accorded credit for military service.

Any eligible veteran who has reason to believe that he or she did not receive a veteran’s preference in accordance with the provisions of this Article or rules adopted under it may appeal that denial as provided by

G.S. 126-34.01

and

G.S. 126-34.02

.

The willful failure of any employee subject to the provisions of Article 8 of this Chapter to comply with the provisions of this Article or rules adopted under it constitutes personal misconduct in accordance with the provisions and promulgated rules of this Chapter, including those for suspension, demotion, or dismissal.

History.

1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1064, s. 1; 2007-286, s. 2; 2013-382, s. 9.1(c); 2014-115, s. 55.3(e).

§ 126-83.
Exceptions.

Notwithstanding

G.S. 126-5

, and notwithstanding provisions in that section that only certain Articles of this Chapter apply to some employees, this Article applies to all persons covered by this Chapter except those exempted by

G.S. 126-5

(c)(2), G.S. 126-5(c)(3), G.S. 126-5(c)(4),

G.S. 126-5(c1)

, G.S. 126-5(c2), or G.S. 126-5(c3), but this Article does not apply to those persons covered by G.S. 126-5(a)(2).

G.S. 128-15

shall apply to those persons exempted from coverage of this Article, but shall not apply to any person covered by this Article.

History.

1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1064, s. 1; 1991, c. 65, s. 9.